Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
CHAPTER 178 County Roads — Grade Crossing Elimination

178.010.
Definitions — Construction of chapter — Minimum requirement for gift.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Construction” includes reconstruction and improvement;

“County roads” are public roads which have been formally accepted by the fiscal court of the county as a part of the county road system, or private roads, streets, or highways which have been acquired by the county pursuant to subsection (3) of this section or KRS

178.405

to

178.425

. “County roads” includes necessary bridges, culverts, sluices, drains, ditches, waterways, embankments or retaining walls; and

“Hard surface road” means a road the surface of which is asphalt, brick, stone block, macadam, concrete, gravel or other material of equal merit.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to take from the jurisdiction or control of the legislative body of any incorporated city any road, bridge, landing or wharf, or any other thing exclusively under the jurisdiction or control of the city.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent any fiscal court from acquiring unimproved land by gift for public purposes. However, on and after July 13, 2004, a fiscal court may only accept a private road, street, or highway by gift if the private road, street, or highway has been constructed to meet minimum construction standards established by the fiscal court.

Nothing in this chapter, including the fact that a municipal street has not been accepted into the county road system, shall prevent any county from entering into an agreement, pursuant to the provisions of KRS

65.210

to

65.300

, with any city located within the county to perform work upon or to provide personnel, materials or equipment for work to be performed upon any street located within the city. A county may pay one hundred percent (100%), or a lesser percentage, of all or any part of the cost of the joint undertaking, based upon the terms agreed to in the interlocal cooperative agreement required by this subsection.

History.

4287, 4294, 4297, 4307: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 68, § 1; 1970, ch. 87, § 1; 1976, ch. 272, § 7; 1978, ch. 384, § 303, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 243, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 7, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 278, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 2000, ch. 82, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 61, § 1, effective July 13, 2004.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/14/2000). The reference to “KRS

65.220

to

65.300

” in subsection (4) of this section has been changed back to its original form of “KRS

65.210

to

65.300

.” Subsection (4) was added to this statute by 1984 Ky. Acts ch. 7, sec. 1, and contained the reference to “KRS

65.210

to 65.300.” Although the amendment of the statute by 1986 Ky. Acts ch. 278, sec. 2 did not change this reference, it was altered to “KRS

65.220

to 65.300” in the codification of that Act. Because it is clear from an examination of KRS Chapter 65 that the range in question is KRS 65.210 to 65.300 and no reason is given or can be determined for altering the text as originally enacted, the original text of the reference has been restored.

178.020.
Roads, bridges, and landings continued — Removal from through road system.

Every county road, bridge, and landing, and every city street and alley heretofore lawfully established and opened and not lawfully discontinued or vacated shall continue as such, until properly discontinued. Every road, street, and alley, used and occupied as a public road, street, or alley, shall be presumed to be a public road, street, or alley, as the case may be. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as interfering with the right of the fiscal court of a county containing a city of the first class or a consolidated local government from detaching a road or a portion thereof from the county through road system.

History.

4925: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 80, § 4; 2002, ch. 346, § 183, effective July 15, 2002.

178.025.
Road presumed established — Presumption of width and area of public road right-of-way.

Any road, street, highway, or parcel of ground, dedicated and laid-off as a public way and used without restrictions on a continuous basis by the general public for fifteen (15) consecutive years, shall conclusively be presumed to be a public road.

In the absence of any record, the width of a public road right-of-way shall be presumed to extend to and include that area lying outside the shoulders and ditch lines and within any landmarks such as fences, fence posts, cornerstones, or other similar monuments indicating the boundary lines.

In the absence of both record or landmark, the right-of-way of a public road shall be deemed to extend to and include the shoulders and ditch lines adjacent to said road and to the top of cuts or toe of fills where such exist.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 108, §§ 1 to 3; 2004, ch. 61, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 236, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

178.030.
Transfers from state to county.

The roads, bridges and landings transferred by the state to the counties in which they are located shall be county roads, bridges and landings. Provided, however, that roads, bridges and landings so transferred shall not become a part of a county through road system in a county containing a city of the first class unless they are made a part of such a system in accordance with KRS

178.330

or

178.333

, or both.

History.

4296: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 80, § 5.

178.040.
Change in width of county road or right-of-way — Minimum width of right-of-way — Acquisition of right-of-way.

In order to change the width of a county road, the fiscal court, an urban-county government, or a consolidated local government shall make a special order for a different width. The order shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk. In order to change the width of the right-of-way of a portion of a county through road system the fiscal court of a county containing a city of the first class or a consolidated local government may make a special order for a different width. The order shall be recorded in the office of the county road engineer.

All county roads and all public roads that are being adopted into a county road system after July 13, 2004, shall occupy a minimum right-of-way width of thirty (30) feet, fifteen (15) feet in each direction as measured from the centerline of the road, unless the fiscal court finds that a thirty (30) foot minimum cannot be met due to the topography of the road or other extraordinary circumstances. All county roads and all public roads that were in existence prior to July 13, 2004, shall not be required to occupy a minimum right-of-way width of thirty (30) feet under this subsection. A fiscal court, an urban-county government, or a consolidated local government may order the minimum right-of-way to be a greater width. All roads added to the county through road system in a county containing a city of the first class or a consolidated local government in accordance with KRS

178.333

shall occupy a right-of-way width as ordered by the fiscal court or the consolidated local government.

In acquiring a right-of-way for a county through road within any city, the fiscal court or the county court of a county containing a city of the first class or the consolidated local government may exercise any powers granted them by statute for the acquisition of property.

History.

4288, 4289: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 80, § 6; 1978, ch. 384, § 304, effective June 17, 1978; 2002, ch. 346, § 184, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 61, § 3, effective July 13, 2004.

178.050.
Notice and advertisement of establishment, alteration or discontinuance, and of letting of contracts.

No county road shall be established or discontinued, or the location thereof changed unless due notice thereof has been given according to the provisions of this chapter.

Notices and advertisements for the establishment, alteration or discontinuance of any county road, bridge or landing, and all notices and advertisements for the letting of contracts for construction or maintenance of county roads and bridges under the provisions of this chapter shall be published pursuant to KRS Chapter 424 by the county road engineer.

History.

4298, 4304: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 153.

178.060.
Changes in location of county road.

The county road engineer may change the location of any county road in his county with the written consent of the owner of the land on which a change is to be made, setting forth the exact changes proposed. The proposed change and the owner’s consent shall be entered in the form of an agreed order of the fiscal court and subject to the approval of the county judge/executive.

The change shall not materially increase the length or grade or require more work to keep the road in repair, or place the road on worse ground than it was before the change, or render the road in any respects worse than it was before the change.

If the county road engineer makes a change in violation of the provisions of this section, the part of the road thus altered shall not be established as a county road, and the former location shall be continued as such.

History.

4299: amend. Acts 1976 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 6, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 305, effective June 17, 1978.

178.070.
Discontinuance of county roads.

The fiscal court may direct any county road to be discontinued. Notice must be published, according to the provisions of KRS

178.050

, and in addition, notices must be placed at three (3) prominent and visible public places within one (1) mile of the road. After posting the notices, the fiscal court shall appoint two (2) viewers who have no vested interest in the discontinuance of the road and who, together with the county road engineer, shall view the road and report in writing at the hearing what inconvenience would result from the discontinuance. Upon presentation of the report and other evidences, if any, at a public meeting of the fiscal court, the court may discontinue the road.

History.

4300: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 68, § 2; 2004, ch. 61, § 4, effective July 13, 2004.

178.080.
Establishment and alteration of public roads, bridges and landings, upon petition.

When any person desires the establishment or alteration of a public road, bridge or landing, he shall petition the fiscal court setting forth in his petition specifically the nature and location of the proposed work. The court shall thereupon appoint two (2) viewers who, together with the county road engineer, shall view the ground and report in writing the advantages and disadvantages which, in their opinion, will result to the individual and to the public from the proposed work and the grades and bearings of the proposed road, and other facts and circumstances that may enable the fiscal court to determine whether the work ought to be undertaken by the county.

If the petition is for the establishment or alteration of a public road leading from a main public road, the report shall set out whether such road should be established, stating specifically whether it would be necessary to take any burying ground, garden, yard, orchard, or any part thereof, or to injure or destroy any buildings and the probable cost of the work, the names of the landowners whose property would have to be taken or injured, which of them would require compensation and the probable amount to which each would be entitled. They shall make careful examination of routes or locations other than that proposed or petitioned for, keeping in view the possible future development of the county and the accommodations of the general traveling public, and shall report to the fiscal court at a public meeting in favor of the one they prefer, giving reasons for the preference. A map giving the grades and bearings of the routes or locations shall be returned with the report.

If it appears to the fiscal court that the interests of the general public may be furthered thereby, the fiscal court shall personally examine the proposed work. If the court decides to undertake the proposed work the county judge/executive shall appoint a day for hearing the parties interested, and cause notices thereof to be given to all interested parties.

If the county judge/executive at any time has sufficient evidence before him to enable him to ascertain what would be a just compensation to the proprietors and tenants, and if the proprietors and tenants are willing to accept what the county judge/executive deems just, the county judge/executive, upon such acceptance being reduced to writing and signed by the proprietors and tenants, may determine to undertake the work, subject to the consent and approval of the fiscal court.

History.

4301: amend. Acts 1976 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 167, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 306, effective June 17, 1978; 2004, ch. 61, § 5, effective July 13, 2004.

178.090.
Conditions may be imposed upon petitioner.

Where the petition is for the establishment or alteration of a public road leading from the main public road, the court may refuse to undertake the proposed work or abandon it after having undertaken it, unless the petitioner, or someone for him, deposits with the fiscal court a sum sufficient to pay all damage and cost sustained by reason of the establishment or alteration of the road. In such case the court may, if it thinks proper, establish the road upon condition that the petitioner shall pay all costs and damages, and make and keep the road in repair, and the court may also impose upon the petitioner, his heirs and assigns, and upon the public, such other conditions in reference to the road as the court finds just.

History.

4302: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 307, effective June 17, 1978.

178.100.
Action to contest decision of fiscal court.

From a decision of the fiscal court ordering a new road to be opened, or ordering an alteration or discontinuance of an existing road, or allowing gates to be erected across a road or abolishing existing gates, or a decision refusing any such order, the party aggrieved may bring an action in the Circuit Court of the county where the road is located to contest the decision of the fiscal court.

History.

4302a-1: amend. Acts 1976 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 168, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 308, effective June 17, 1978; 2004, ch. 61, § 6, effective July 13, 2004.

178.110.
Condemnation of right-of-way — Temporary roads.

If the court decides to establish or alter a county road, bridge or landing, and the compensation to be paid for the right-of-way cannot be fixed by agreement, the right-of-way shall be condemned under the procedure set forth in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

In case of roadbeds or bridges, or a portion of them, washing or slipping away, or in case of extreme emergency, and when in its judgment conditions warrant it, the fiscal court may immediately open and have surveyed a road or passway to be temporarily used while the commissioners appointed under the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky are acting, or while the matter is pending in the court to establish a permanent road or passway, and the commissioners shall assess the damages of the temporary road or use thereof. The same proceedings shall be had to recover damages as in recovery in regard to other roads.

But when such compensation is ascertained it shall be at the option of the fiscal court to pay it or to abandon the proposed undertaking. If it decides to pay the compensation, the fiscal court of the county shall include in its next levy an amount sufficient therefor.

Not more than two (2) acres shall be condemned for a landing.

History.

4302: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 78; 1978, ch. 384, § 309, effective June 17, 1978.

178.115.
Power of fiscal court to open, establish or alter road — Procedure — Appeal.

Whenever the fiscal court of any county deems it to be in the best interest of the county to open, establish or alter the location of any public road, street, alley, ditch, culvert, bridge or similar public way or structure in the county, the fiscal court shall adopt a resolution setting forth the necessity for the public road or structure, and thereupon the public road or structure shall be deemed opened, established or altered, as the case may be, on behalf of the county. A certified copy of the resolution shall be posted at the courthouse door of the county within five (5) days after its adoption and a certified copy of the resolution shall be posted by the county road engineer of the county along or at the proposed road or structure within five (5) days after its adoption.

In all cases where public roads or structures have been established, any person or persons aggrieved thereby may prosecute an appeal from a resolution of the fiscal court by filing a petition in equity in the Circuit Court of the county where the road or structure is located setting forth his grievance, to which petition shall be attached an attested or certified copy of the resolution. The petition shall be filed within thirty-five (35) days from the date the resolution was entered. An appeal shall be heard and decided by the court without the intervention of a jury. Any party so appealing shall execute and file a bond for costs at the time such appeal is taken. An appeal to the Court of Appeals may be taken in accordance with the Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 128, §§ 1, 2; 1960, ch. 104, § 12; 2004, ch. 61, § 7, effective July 13, 2004.

178.116.
Discontinuance of a road.

Any county road, or road formerly maintained by the county or state, shall be deemed discontinued and possession shall revert to the owner or owners of the tract of land to which it originally belonged unless at least one (1) of the following conditions exists:

A public need is served by the road;

The road provides a necessary access for a private person;

The road has been maintained and policed by the county or state within a three (3) year period.

If the only condition which exists is for a necessary access for a private person, by a joint petition of all parties entitled to such access, the road shall be deemed discontinued and possession shall revert to the owner or owners of the tract of land to which it originally belonged.

If the only condition which exists is for a necessary access for a private person, by joint petition of all parties entitled to such access, the road shall be closed to public use but remain open in accordance with its condition and use for the access of the private parties involved.

If a county road has been discontinued under the provisions of KRS

178.070

, then by a joint petition of all private parties entitled to necessary access the road shall be closed to public use but remain open in accordance with its condition and use for the access of the private parties involved, or by a joint petition of all parties entitled to necessary access the road shall revert to the owner or owners of the tract or tracts of land to which it originally belonged.

For the purposes of this chapter “necessary access” shall be construed to include access to any farm, tract of land, or dwelling, or to any portions of such farm, tract of land, or dwelling.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 243, § 3, effective July 15, 1980.

178.117.
Private improvement of public road in unincorporated territory — When permitted — Procedure.

Any person or corporation, public or private, or any group of such persons or corporations or both, residing in or owning property adjacent to any publicly dedicated road in unincorporated territory in any county and desiring to make any improvements to the publicly dedicated road shall submit to the fiscal court, the urban-county government, or the consolidated local government for approval plans and specifications for its improvements at their own expense. Any request for private improvement shall include all the information required by KRS

184.020

to accompany a request for the creation of a public road district pursuant to that section.

The sponsors of the private improvement of the publicly dedicated road shall present their request, together with the attached maps and estimates of cost, to the fiscal court, the urban-county government, or the consolidated local government, who shall turn over to the county engineer for his or her consideration the maps and estimates of cost. In considering whether to permit the requested improvement, the fiscal court, the urban-county government, or the consolidated local government, and the county engineer shall follow the same procedures provided for in KRS

184.040

and the same appellate rights provided for in these sections are available to the petitioners. When the county engineer receives from the fiscal court, the urban-county government, or the consolidated local government an application for approval of plans or specifications for the private improvement of publicly dedicated roads by some individual or corporation, or a combination thereof, the county engineer shall be authorized and empowered to examine, inspect, and investigate, as seems to be advisable, the sufficiency of the improvements which the application seeks to serve the purposes intended, and to establish and make reasonable charges for his or her services on the basis of a schedule adjusted according to the services required to conduct the investigation or on any other reasonable method.

When it appears to the county engineer that the completion of the improvement by or on behalf of any individual or corporation requires inspection and supervision in order to assure the protection of the public safety and the proper subsequent completion of the work for the purposes intended, the county engineer shall include findings in his or her recommendation to the fiscal court, the urban-county government, or the consolidated local government approving, modifying, or disapproving the particular plans and projects, and shall charge the person or corporation for the inspection and supervision on the basis of the actual cost of inspection plus a reasonable additional cost of supervision.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 80, § 10; 1976 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 6, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 310, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 64, § 18, effective July 13, 1984; 2002, ch. 346, § 185, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 61, § 8, effective July 13, 2004.

178.120.
Condemnation of land by fiscal court.

Whenever the fiscal court of any county deems it to be in the best interest of the county to open, establish, construct, alter or repair any public road, street, alley, ditch or bridge of the county and the fiscal court is unable to contract with the owner of the land, required for such purpose, for its purchase or to acquire the same by gift, the land may be condemned under the procedure set forth in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

4302a-2: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 79.

178.125.
Condemnation of additional land adjacent to existing road — Procedure.

Whenever the fiscal court of any county deems it to be in the best interest of the county to acquire additional land adjacent to an existing county road to provide for future widening and improvement of said road, and the fiscal court is unable to contract with the owners of the land required for such purposes for its purchase or to acquire the same by gift, the land may be condemned under the provisions set forth in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

The resolution authorizing condemnation shall set forth the facts of the proposed acquisition, including a description of the land sought to be acquired, which description may be stated in widths from the existing centerline of the road proposed to be improved. In condemnation for future improvement under this section it shall not be necessary for the county to have completed plans for actual construction; Provided, the property owner is furnished with an accurate description of the property sought to be condemned. The right-of-way thus obtained shall be for reasonably foreseeable future construction and improvement in conformity with the existing grade of said road and with free access to adjacent property.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 220; 1976, ch. 140, § 80.

178.130.
County may do work or award contracts. [Repealed.]

178.140.
Awarding of contracts — Rejection of bids.

All bids for the construction or maintenance of county roads and bridges shall be received at the time and place specified in the advertisement, and shall be opened publicly at the time of awarding, and the amount of items comprising each bid shall be publicly announced.

The contract shall be awarded to the lowest and best bidder, who shall furnish satisfactory security in an amount equal to the amount of the contract in question, to be approved by the county judge/executive of the county.

The fiscal court may reserve twenty percent (20%) of the amount accruing on the contract until the completion of the work and the approval thereof by the county road engineer.

The fiscal court may reject any and all bids, and may readvertise for and receive bids. If satisfactory bids cannot be obtained, the fiscal court may have the work done in the manner it deems best.

History.

4303, 4304, 4356m.

178.150.
Department of Highways to render assistance in certain cases.

When it is necessary to build or repair a bridge and the building and repair will cost more than five hundred dollars ($500), the county road engineer shall notify the Department of Highways that such work is to be done. The Department of Highways shall then furnish to the county road engineer plans, specifications and estimates of cost, which he shall submit to the fiscal court. The county road engineer shall keep in his records the plans, specifications and estimates of cost furnished by the Department of Highways, and also the plans, specifications and estimates of cost and the actual cost of the repair or construction work which is actually done. The fiscal court shall not be required to accept the plans, specifications and estimates furnished by the Department of Highways.

This same plan shall be followed in making the purchase of all county road machinery, when the amount of the purchase is five hundred dollars ($500) or more.

When a new hard surface road is to be built, or an old dirt road converted into a hard surface road, the county road engineer of the county in which the improvement is to be made shall notify the Department of Highways, and the department shall send an assistant engineer to assist in laying out the road, and in drawing plans and specifications and making up estimates of cost for the road. This shall be done at the expense of the state. The fiscal court shall not be compelled to accept the plans and specifications of the engineer furnished by the Department of Highways, but a record of them shall be kept. After contracts are awarded, the estimates furnished by the Department of Highways and the contract price shall be published as advertisements provided for in KRS

178.050

.

History.

4305.

178.155.
Effect of lack of maintenance of road by county for fifteen years. [Repealed.]

178.160.
Construction and maintenance of hard surface roads by contract. [Repealed.]

178.170.
Bonds for hard surface roads — Issuance.

The fiscal court, after an election as provided in subsection (2), may issue and sell bonds for the purpose of constructing or reconstructing public roads and bridges. The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates or method of determining rates as the fiscal court determines, be payable at least annually, and shall be in denominations of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1000). The bonds shall mature within forty (40) years, and may be redeemed within that time at the pleasure of the court.

Upon the petition of one hundred and fifty (150) legal voters who are freeholders of the county, the county judge/executive shall make an order on his order book directing an election to be held in the county at the next regularly-scheduled November election if the question as it will appear on the ballot is submitted to the county clerk not later than the second Tuesday in August preceding the regular election. The order shall direct the sheriff to advertise the election and its object by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424 and also by printed handbills posted at not less than four (4) public places in each voting precinct in the county and at the courthouse door. The election shall be held under the general election laws. The question shall be: “Are you in favor of issuing . . . . . in bonds for the purpose of building roads and bridges?”

All the money raised by the sale of bonds under this section shall be used solely for the construction of hard surface roads.

History.

4307: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 154; 1978, ch. 384, § 311, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 135, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 195, § 66, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 274, § 39, effective July 15, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). This section was amended by 1996 Ky. Acts chs. 195 and 274. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 195, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

178.180.
Commissioners may be appointed to handle proceeds of bonds.

The fiscal court of any county may select or appoint four (4) or more commissioners who are freeholders and legal voters and residents of the county, to act as a road commission in the handling of any funds derived from the sale of bonds authorized and voted by the county for the purpose of constructing and reconstructing roads and bridges. The commissioners shall be equally divided between the two (2) dominant political parties of the county.

The commissioners shall each give a bond, approved by the county judge/executive. The commissioners shall be allowed a reasonable compensation for their services by the fiscal court, to be paid out of the county road fund.

The commissioners shall be selected at least fifteen (15) days before the date of the election on the question of the bond issue, and their names shall be published pursuant to KRS Chapter 424.

History.

4307a-1, 4307a-3: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 155.

178.190.
Duties of commissioners — Supervision.

The duties of the commissioners in regard to the construction, reconstruction and designation of roads to be built with the proceeds of the bond issue, shall be the same as those now exercised by the fiscal court.

If the county receives financial aid from the state, the commissioners shall act under the supervision of the Department of Highways.

History.

4307a-2, 4307a-4.

178.200.
Tax levy to retire bonds and pay interest.

If bonds are sold to enable the fiscal court to construct roads and bridges, the fiscal court shall levy a tax of not over twenty cents ($0.20) on the one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed valuation of the county. The tax shall be collected as other county taxes and allocated, first, to the payment of the interest on the bonds, and the balance placed to the credit of a sinking fund for the redemption of the bonds.

Any accumulation in the sinking fund may be loaned by the fiscal court on first mortgage real estate security, on the basis of fifty percent (50%) of its value, at the legal rate of interest, which shall accrue to the sinking fund, but before the loan is made all titles shall be looked up and papers approved by the county attorney.

For the 1966 tax year and for all subsequent years the rate levied by the levying authority under the provisions of this section for levies which were approved prior to December 16, 1965, shall be the compensating tax rate as defined in KRS

132.010

, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

Notwithstanding the limitations contained in subsection (3) of this section no tax rate shall be set lower than that necessary to provide such funds as are required to meet principal and interest payments on outstanding bonded indebtedness.

History.

4308: amend. Acts 1965 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 9.

178.210.
Special tax for construction of roads — Submission to vote — Short-term bonds.

The fiscal court of any county may submit to the voters at a special election to be held for that purpose, the question of voting a tax of any sum not exceeding twenty cents ($0.20) on the hundred dollars ($100) on all property subject by law to local taxation, for the construction of the public roads and bridges of the county, as the fiscal court directs. The order of the fiscal court calling the election shall specify the amount of the tax to be levied each year and the number of years for which the tax may be imposed, not exceeding ten (10) years, and shall also provide that no money in excess of the amount that can be raised by the levy in any one (1) year shall be expended in that year.

The fiscal court may borrow money and issue bonds therefor in advance of the collection of the tax for any year, but the amount borrowed shall not exceed eighty percent (80%) of the estimated tax for the year. The amount of the tax shall be estimated according to the assessment and collection of the preceding year. Any money so borrowed shall be paid out of the money raised from the tax in the year in which the money is borrowed.

For the 1966 tax year and for all subsequent years the rate levied by the levying authority under the provisions of this section for levies which were approved prior to December 16, 1965, shall be the compensating tax rate as defined in KRS

132.010

, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

Notwithstanding the limitations contained in subsection (3) of this section no tax rate shall be set lower than that necessary to provide such funds as are required to meet principal and interest payments on outstanding bonded indebtedness.

History.

4307b-1, 4307b-2: amend. Acts 1965 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 10.

178.220.
Vote on special tax — Form of question.

The question submitted to the voters shall be: “Are you in favor of a property tax of . . . . . cents on each one hundred dollars’ ($100) worth of property in the county, to be levied each year for . . . . . years, for the purpose of improving or constructing, either or both, the roads and bridges of the county?” The rate of taxation and the number of years for which the tax is to be levied shall be inserted in respective blank spaces, and two (2) small squares shall be placed opposite and on the right of the question, one (1) for votes for and one (1) for votes against the measure, designated respectively by the words “Yes” and “No.”

If a majority of those voting upon this proposition are in favor of it, then as soon as the result has been ascertained and certified, the fiscal court shall make provision for the road and bridge work contemplated.

History.

4307b-3.

178.230.
Collection of special tax — Sheriff’s fee.

The sheriff shall collect the taxes at the same time and in the same manner that he collects other taxes and shall pay the proceeds over as the fiscal court directs. For the collection of the tax levied under KRS

178.210

to

178.240

, the sheriff shall be entitled to a commission of one percent (1%) of the amount collected.

History.

4307b-4.

178.240.
Advertisement of special tax election — Conduct of election.

The fiscal court shall direct the sheriff to advertise the time and purpose of the election and the amount of tax to be levied each year. The advertisement shall be published pursuant to KRS Chapter 424.

The election shall be held under the general election laws.

History.

4307b-5, 4307b-6: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 156.

DECISIONS UNDER PRIOR LAW

178.250.
Joint bridges and roads between counties.

When it is necessary to build or repair any bridge across any stream on the line between two (2) counties, or to construct or repair any road between two (2) counties, or along the boundary line thereof, the fiscal courts of the counties may enter into such agreement therefor as they find best, but if they disagree, the fiscal court of each county shall appoint two (2) special commissioners who, together with the county road engineer of each county and a representative of the Department of Highways, shall meet and arrange the matter.

The fiscal court of each county interested shall notify the Department of Highways of the action taken and request its assistance in the matter and the decision reached by the committee thus appointed, acting jointly with the representative of the Department of Highways, shall be binding.

If the fiscal court of any county, upon being requested to do so, fails to appoint commissioners, or if either court fails in any respect to fulfill its part of the agreement with respect to work, the remedy by mandamus shall lie before the Circuit Court of the county whose fiscal court is complained of on behalf of the fiscal court of the other county, and the Circuit Court shall compel the fiscal court complained of to do what ought to be done in the matter.

History.

4309.

178.260.
Contracts for work on joint bridges and roads.

If the fiscal courts decide to make the improvements, the county road engineer of each county shall request the Department of Highways to furnish plans, specifications and estimates of cost, in accordance with KRS

178.150

, and shall advertise for bids, as provided in KRS

178.050

, in each of the counties, and the contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder who shall furnish satisfactory security to be approved by the county judge/executive of each county. The fiscal courts, voting separately, shall approve the plans and specifications and shall jointly award the contract.

History.

4310.

178.270.
Costs of joint roads and bridges.

The contract for the work shall specify the portion of the costs to be paid by each fiscal court, and each county shall be severally liable for its proportion. The cost of the work shall be borne in proportion to the total assessed value of each county.

After the completion of the work, the improvement shall be maintained by the fiscal courts or other authorities of the counties or other political divisions joining in the improvements, who shall bear and pay the same proportion of the costs that they severally bore toward the cost of the original improvements.

History.

4311.

178.280.
Abandoned turnpikes and improved roads to be maintained by county. [Repealed.]

178.290.
Construction of sidewalks along public roads — School bus turn-around areas.

Any person may build a sidewalk composed of gravel, concrete, or other suitable material along the side of any public road in this state. The sidewalk shall not exceed sixty (60) inches in width and the construction and repair and the use of the sidewalk shall be without expense of any kind to any other person who may want to use it. All persons who desire shall be permitted to use the sidewalk, and it shall be so constructed as not to interfere with the traveling public on any public road. The governing body of each city, county, urban-county, consolidated local government, and charter county may build and repair sidewalks along public roads where the need exists for the safety of school children. Before the beginning of construction of the sidewalk, written approval must be obtained from the governmental agency having jurisdiction over the public road.

The fiscal court may, where needed, build and maintain suitable areas for the safe turning around of school buses.

History.

4318: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 51, § 1; 1970, ch. 250, § 1; 2006, ch. 236, § 2, effective July 12, 2006.